Washington statutes.
RCW 7.70.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter "health care provider" means either:

(1) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or related services including, but not limited to, an acupuncturist or acupuncture and Eastern medicine practitioner, a physician, osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician, physician assistant, midwife, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic, including, in the event such person is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;

(2) An employee or agent of a person described in part (1) above, acting in the course and scope of his [or her] employment, including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or

(3) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or institution employing one or more persons described in part (1) above, including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his or her employment, including in the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative.

[ 2019 c 308 s 16; 2010 c 286 s 13; 1995 c 323 s 3; 1985 c 326 s 27; 1981 c 53 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.

Intent—2010 c 286: See RCW 18.06.005.

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 4.16.350.